




Revolution



































Product Engine









A REVOLUTIONARY Approach in Drug Discovery
Our innovative product engine draws inspiration from nature and evolution, which can be a source of insights into cancer targets, disease mechanisms and therapeutic approaches.  We pay particular attention to natural products that are inherently rich with biological function as a result of natural selection and can inform and guide our discovery and development of small molecules that can modulate such targets. Our use of biologically relevant chemical information from nature depends on our ability to synthesize and modify complex natural products, specific portions of these complex compounds, and entirely original molecules inspired by natural products.
Our REVBLOCKS™ platform builds upon the research of the company’s academic founder, Martin D. Burke, M.D., Ph.D., who invented a transformative method for synthesizing chemical compounds including complex natural products, analogs or original small molecules that are pharmaceutically optimized. REVBLOCKS is a rapid, standardized and powerful process for conducting advanced medicinal chemistry by assembling simple “chemical building blocks” into refined structures that have significant potential as best-in-class drug candidates. REVOLUTION Medicines is thus able to synthesize, modify and improve many complex compounds that would be very challenging or even impossible to modify without this approach. We practice this technology under an exclusive license agreement with the University of Illinois.
In addition to our modular synthesis technology, REVOLUTION Medicines deploys its REVEAL™ platform to help guide design of compounds. REVEAL is a knowledge-driven informatics system designed to recognize advantageous structural and functional properties of scaffolds that can be exploited to engage protein targets. By learning from nature's experience in this way, we can elevate certain preferred compounds or portions of compouds as chemical starting points for optimization as drug candidates that will engage and modulate important disease targets. This computational platform also supports the process of optimization of lead compounds.



PRODUCT ENGINE
REVBLOCKS
REVEAL












 


REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 9:41 AM ET
Biotechnology

Company Overview of REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc. engages in the discovery and development of medicines from natural products. It develops therapies that harness the complex chemicals of life by reconfiguring natural substances into medicines. The company’s drug candidates include original small molecules that exploit and improve upon the properties of amphotericin B, a antifungal compound. The company was founded in 2015 and is based in Redwood City, California.


700 Saginaw DriveRedwood City, CA 94063United StatesFounded in 2015



www.revolutionmedicines.com







Key Executives for REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc.




Dr. Mark A. Goldsmith M.D., Ph.D.


      	Chief Executive Officer, President and Director
      


Age: 55
        







Mr. Martin D. Burke M.D., Ph.D.


      	Founder and Chairman of Scientific Advisory Board
      








Dr. Michael A. Fischbach Ph.D.


      	Academic Co-Founder and Member of Scientific Advisory Board
      


Age: 36
        







Dr. Kevan Shokat Ph.D.


      	Academic Co-Founder and Member of Scientific Advisory Board
      








Dr. Stephen M. Kelsey M.D., F.R.C.P., F.R.C. (Path.)


      	President of Research and Development
      


Age: 56
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc. Key Developments

REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc. Appoints Stephen (Steve) Kelsey as President of Research and Development
Mar 20 17
REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc. announced the appointment of Stephen (Steve) Kelsey, M.D., an accomplished physician-scientist, oncologist and cancer drug developer, as president of research and development. Dr. Kelsey has extensive industry experience in oncology discovery and development. Most recently, he served as president of Onkaido Therapeutics.


REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc. Announces Board Appointments
Dec 13 16
REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc. announced that noted chemical biologist and cancer investigator Kevan Shokat, Ph.D. has joined the company as an academic co-founder and member of the company's scientific advisory board, along with co-founders Martin Burke, M.D., Ph.D.  and Michael Fischbach, Ph.D.  The company also appointed accomplished industry veteran Julian Adams, Ph.D., leading structural biologist John Kuriyan, Ph.D., and noted clinical and translational oncologist Trever Bivona, M.D., Ph.D., to its scientific advisory board. Dr.  Shokat currently serves as professor and vice-chair in the department of cellular and molecular pharmacology at University of California, San Francisco, professor in the department of chemistry at University of California, Berkeley and investigator at the Howard Hughes Medical Institute. Dr.  Adams currently serves as president, research and development at Infinity Pharmaceuticals. Dr.  Kuriyan currently serves as professor of biochemistry and molecular biology in the department of molecular and cell biology at the University of California, Berkeley. Dr.  Bivona is an associate professor at the University of California, San Francisco.


REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc. Announces New Appointments
Jun 14 16
REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc. announced that noted chemical biologist Michael Fischbach,Ph.D.has joined the company as an academic co-founder. He joins Martin Burke, M.D., Ph.D., who founded the company with Third Rock Ventures, on the company’s scientific advisory board. The company also appointed distinguished medicinal chemist and life sciences entrepreneur Eric Gordon, Ph.D. as a senior advisor and member of the company’s scientific advisory board. Michael Fischbach, Ph.D. is an associate professor in the department of bioengineering and therapeutic sciences at University of California, San Francisco and a member of the California Institute for Quantitative Biosciences.  Dr. Fischbach is recipient of numerous awards and grants, and he and his research laboratory are recognized widely for their combined use of genomics and chemistry to identify and characterize small molecules from microbes, with an emphasis on the human microbiome.  Previously, he was an independent fellow at Massachusetts General Hospital coordinating a collaborative effort based at the Broad Institute to develop genomics-based approaches to the discovery of small molecules from microbes. Dr. Fischbach is a member of the scientific advisory boards of NGM Biopharmaceuticals and Symbiota, and a member of the Board of Directors of Achaogen. Eric Gordon, Ph.D. is a consulting professor at Stanford University and authority in the fields of medicinal chemistry and antibiotic and natural product synthesis. He has more than 40 years of pharmaceutical and biotech expertise with a strong track record as a drug discovery executive, biotechnology entrepreneur, and life sciences venture investor. Previously, he was head of medicinal chemistry at Squibb and Bristol Myers Squibb and subsequently he served as vice president of research and director of chemistry at Affymax.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 20n Labs, Inc. United States 23andMe, Inc. United States 2C Tech Corporation, Inc. United States 3-V Biosciences, Inc. United States 3Bar Biologics Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact REVOLUTION Medicines, Inc., please visit www.revolutionmedicines.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























	Revolution Medicines Inc. - Company Profile - BioCentury




























































Publications
archives
BCIQ
Conferences
version 4.3.15.600





Free Trial / Subscribe


SIGN IN



English
简体中文
日本語
한국어







Biocentury





Menu





                                        Home
                                        
+




                                        Publications
                                        
+



Publications Home >


BioCentury>


BC Innovations>


BC Extra>


BC Week In Review>


Current Issues>




Archives 
                                        
+



Archives Home >


Basic Search>


Advanced Search>


Back Issues>




BCIQ
                                        
+



BCIQ Home >


Overview>


Pipeline Analyst>


Financial Analyst>


Company Analyst>


Deal Analyst>




Conferences 
                                        
+




Conferences Home >


Newsmakers


Bio€quity Europe


Future Leaders


China Healthcare Summit


Other Industry Events





eLearning 
                                        
+



eLearning Home >


Videos>


White Papers>


                                            Follow Us
                                            


























BCIQ / Company Profile


BCIQ Overview   |    
                        Settings   |   
                        Support















Biocentury



Print this                                                    
                        
















                         
                            

    

    

    
                         
                        



                            Revolution Medicines Inc.
                        









print preview


export


bookmark


share with colleague





















General Information
                    






 Location

Redwood City, Calif.


 Region

San Francisco Bay Area


 Country

U.S.


 Business Category

Infectious


 Year Founded

2015


 Website

http://www.revolutionmedicines.com



 Lead Product Status

Preclinical






















 Archive Items are loading
                            













 Financial Information
                        






 Financing
                                                Summary







 Financing Details







 Earnings
                                    Summary
                                






 Stocks Annual Chart
                                





















 Pipeline Information
                        






 Pipeline
                                                Summary







 Pipeline Details




















 Deals Information
                        






 Deals
                                                Summary







 Deals Details






















About Biocentury


Company Overview


Management


Editorial & Research




Contact


Contact Us


Advertising & Sponsorship


Career Opportunities




Support


Forgot Password


Customer Service


Reprints


FAQs




Products & Solutions


Products Overview


Publications


Archives


BCIQ


Conferences


eLearning


RSS Feeds




Legal


User Agreement


Terms of Use


Privacy Policy


Your California Privacy Rights


Use of Images

Follow Us
                            











What is BioCentury?
BioCentury employs a fully integrated multimedia platform — including publications, video, online data solutions and conferences — to provide its audience with authoritative and up-to-date intelligence about corporate strategy, partnering, emerging technology, clinical data, public policy and the financial markets.

Sign in
Free Trial












© 2017 BioCentury Inc. All Rights Reserved.
     
                        Terms & Conditions
                          |  
                        Privacy Policy











Set Email Alert






dummy















Revolution for Animal Use - Drugs.com




































Skip to Content












Search:



All

AllConsumerProfessionalPill IDInteractionsNewsFDA AlertsApprovalsPipelineClinical TrialsCare NotesEncyclopediaDictionaryNatural Products 










Browse all medications:

a
b
c
d
e
f
g
h
i
j
k
l
m
n
o
p
q
r
s
t
u
v
w
x
y
z


Advanced Search






Topics & Tools





Facebook 
Twitter 
Google Plus 






Sign In


Sign In
Register







Menu










 



Home › Vet › Revolution



Print
 Share








Revolution
This page contains information on Revolution for veterinary use.
The information provided typically includes the following:

Revolution Indications
Warnings and cautions for Revolution
Direction and dosage information for Revolution


Revolution
This treatment applies to the following species:

Cats
Dogs

 Manufacturer: Zoetis
Topical Parasiticide For Dogs and Cats
NADA 141-152, Approved by FDA
Revolution Caution
US Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian.
Description
Revolution (selamectin) Topical Parasiticide is available as a colorless to yellow, ready to use solution in single dose tubes for topical (dermal) treatment of dogs six weeks of age and older and cats eight weeks of age and older. The content of each tube is formulated to provide a minimum of 2.7 mg/lb (6 mg/kg) of body weight of selamectin. The chemical composition of selamectin is (5Z, 25S) - 25 - cyclohexyl - 4’ - O - de(2,6 - dideoxy - 3 - O - methyl - α - L - arabino - hexopyranosyl) - 5 - demethoxy - 25 - de(1 - methylpropyl) - 22, 23 - dihydro - 5 - hydroxyiminoavermectin A1a.
Revolution Indications
Revolution is recommended for use in dogs six weeks of age or older and cats eight weeks of age and older for the following parasites and indications:
Dogs:
Revolution kills adult fleas and prevents flea eggs from hatching for one month and is indicated for the prevention and control of flea infestations (Ctenocephalides felis), prevention of heartworm disease caused by Dirofilaria immitis, and the treatment and control of ear mite (Otodectes cynotis) infestations. Revolution also is indicated for the treatment and control of sarcoptic mange (Sarcoptes scabiei) and for the control of tick infestations due to Dermacentor variabilis.
Cats:
Revolution kills adult fleas and prevents flea eggs from hatching for one month and is indicated for the prevention and control of flea infestations (Ctenocephalides felis), prevention of heartworm disease caused by Dirofilaria immitis, and the treatment and control of ear mite (Otodectes cynotis) infestations. Revolution is also indicated for the treatment and control of roundworm (Toxocara cati) and intestinal hookworm (Ancylostoma tubaeforme) infections in cats.
Warnings
Not for human use. Keep out of the reach of children.
In humans, Revolution may be irritating to skin and eyes. Reactions such as hives, itching and skin redness have been reported in humans in rare instances. Individuals with known hypersensitivity to Revolution should use the product with caution or consult a health care professional. Revolution contains isopropyl alcohol and the preservative butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT). Wash hands after use and wash off any product in contact with the skin immediately with soap and water. If contact with eyes occurs, then flush eyes copiously with water. In case of ingestion by a human, contact a physician immediately. The material safety data sheet (MSDS) provides more detailed occupational safety information. For a copy of the MSDS or to report adverse reactions attributable to exposure to this product, call 1-888-963-8471.
Flammable - Keep away from heat, sparks, open flames or other sources of ignition.
Do not use in sick, debilitated or underweight animals (see SAFETY).
Precautions
Prior to administration of Revolution, dogs should be tested for existing heartworm infections. At the discretion of the veterinarian, infected dogs should be treated to remove adult heartworms. Revolution is not effective against adult D. immitis and, while the number of circulating microfilariae may decrease following treatment, Revolution is not effective for microfilariae clearance.
Hypersensitivity reactions have not been observed in dogs with patent heartworm infections administered three times the recommended dose of Revolution. Higher doses were not tested.
Adverse Reactions
Pre-approval clinical trials:
Following treatment with Revolution, transient localized alopecia with or without inflammation at or near the site of application was observed in approximately 1% of 691 treated cats. Other signs observed rarely (≤0.5% of 1743 treated cats and dogs) included vomiting, loose stool or diarrhea with or without blood, anorexia, lethargy, salivation, tachypnea, and muscle tremors.
Post-approval experience:
In addition to the aforementioned clinical signs that were reported in pre-approval clinical trials, there have been reports of pruritus, urticaria, erythema, ataxia, fever, and rare reports of death. There have also been rare reports of seizures in dogs (see WARNINGS).
DOSAGE:
The recommended minimum dose is 2.7 mg selamectin per pound (6 mg/kg) of body weight.
Administer the entire contents of a single dose tube (or two tubes used in combination for dogs weighing over 130 pounds) of Revolution topically in accordance with the following tables. (See ADMINISTRATION for the recommended treatment intervals.)



Cats (lb)


Package color


mg per tube


Potency
(mg/mL)


Administered volume (mL)




Up to 5


Mauve


15 mg


60


0.25




5.1-15


Blue


45 mg


60


0.75




15.1-22


Taupe


60 mg


60


1.0



For cats over 22 lbs use the appropriate combination of tubes.



Dogs (lb)


Package color


mg per tube


Potency
(mg/mL)


Administered volume (mL)




Up to 5


Mauve


15 mg


60


0.25




5.1-10


Purple


30 mg


120


0.25




10.1-20


Brown


60 mg


120


0.5




20.1-40


Red


120 mg


120


1.0




40.1-85


Teal


240 mg


120


2.0




85.1-130


Plum


360 mg


120


3.0



For dogs over 130 lbs use the appropriate combination of tubes.
Recommended for use in dogs 6 weeks of age and older and in cats 8 weeks of age and older.
ADMINISTRATION:
A veterinarian or veterinary technician should demonstrate or instruct the pet owner regarding the appropriate technique for applying Revolution topically to dogs and cats prior to first use.
Firmly press the cap down to puncture the seal on the Revolution tube; a clicking sound will confirm that the cap has successfully punctured the seal. Remove the cap and check to ensure that the tip of the tube is open. To administer the product, part the hair on the back of the animal at the base of the neck in front of the shoulder blades until the skin is visible. Place the tip of the tube on the skin and squeeze the tube 3 or 4 times to empty its entire contents directly onto the skin in one spot. Keeping the tube squeezed, drag it away from the liquid and lift to remove. Check the tube to ensure that it is empty. Do not massage the product into the skin. Due to alcohol content, do not apply to broken skin. Avoid contact between the product and fingers. Do not apply when the haircoat is wet. Bathing or shampooing the dog 2 or more hours after treatment will not reduce the effectiveness of Revolution against fleas or heartworm. Bathing or shampooing the cat 2 hours after treatment will not reduce the effectiveness of Revolution against fleas. Bathing or shampooing the cat 24 hours after treatment will not reduce the effectiveness of Revolution against heartworm. Stiff hair, clumping of hair, hair discoloration, or a slight powdery residue may be observed at the treatment site in some animals. These effects are temporary and do not affect the safety or effectiveness of the product. Discard empty tubes in your ordinary household refuse.
Flea Control In Dogs And Cats
For the prevention and control of flea infestations, Revolution should be administered at monthly intervals throughout the flea season, starting one month before fleas become active. In controlled laboratory studies >98% of fleas were killed within 36 hours. Results of clinical field studies using Revolution monthly demonstrated >90% control of flea infestations within 30 days of the first dose. Dogs and cats treated with Revolution, including those with pre-existing flea allergy dermatitis, showed improvement in clinical signs associated with fleas as a direct result of eliminating the fleas from the animals and their environment.
If the dog or cat is already infested with fleas when the first dose of Revolution is administered, adult fleas on the animal are killed and no viable fleas hatch from eggs after the first administration. However, an environmental infestation of fleas may persist for a short time after beginning treatment with Revolution because of the emergence of adult fleas from pupae.
Heartworm Prevention In Dogs And Cats
For the prevention of heartworm disease, Revolution must be administered on a monthly basis. Revolution may be administered year-round or at least within one month after the animal’s first exposure to mosquitoes and monthly thereafter until the end of the mosquito season. The final dose must be given within one month after the last exposure to mosquitoes. If a dose is missed and a monthly interval between dosing is exceeded then immediate administration of Revolution and resumption of monthly dosing will minimize the opportunity for the development of adult heartworms. When replacing another heartworm preventive product in a heartworm disease prevention program, the first dose of Revolution must be given within a month of the last dose of the former medication.
Selamectin, the active ingredient in Revolution, is a macrocyclic lactone compound. These compounds effectively prevent the development of adult heartworms when administered to dogs and cats within one month of exposure to infective (L3) Dirofilaria immitis larvae. Efficacy of macrocyclic lactones decreases below 100% in dogs, however, if first administered >2 months after exposure to infective larvae. Thus, in heartworm endemic regions, delaying initiation of heartworm prevention using Revolution beyond 2 months of first exposure to infective larvae (e.g., starting puppies and kittens at >8 weeks of age), or gaps of >2 months in the administration of Revolution during periods of heartworm transmission, increases the risk of the animal acquiring heartworms. Animals with unknown heartworm history that test negative for heartworms prior to the initiation of Revolution may be harboring pre-patent infections at the time Revolution was started. Testing such animals 3-4 months after initiation of Revolution would be necessary to confirm their negative heartworm status.
At the discretion of the veterinarian, cats ≥6 months of age may be tested to determine the presence of existing heartworm infections before beginning treatment with Revolution. Cats already infected with adult heartworms can be given Revolution monthly to prevent further infections.
Ear Mite Treatment In Dogs And Cats
For the treatment of ear mite (O. cynotis) infestations in dogs and cats, Revolution should be administered once as a single topical dose. A second monthly dose may be required in some dogs. Monthly use of Revolution will control any subsequent ear mite infestations. In the clinical field trials ears were not cleaned, and many animals still had debris in their ears after the second dose. Cleansing of the infested ears is recommended to remove the debris.
Sarcoptic Mange Treatment In Dogs
For the treatment of sarcoptic mange (S. scabiei) in dogs, Revolution should be administered once as a single topical dose. A second monthly dose may be required in some dogs. Monthly use of Revolution will control any subsequent sarcoptic mange mite infestations. Because of the difficulty in finding sarcoptic mange mites on skin scrapings, effectiveness assessments also were based on resolution of clinical signs. Resolution of the pruritus associated with the mite infestations was observed in approximately 50% of the dogs 30 days after the first treatment and in approximately 90% of the dogs 30 days after the second monthly treatment.
Tick Control In Dogs
For the control of tick (Dermacentor variabilis) infestations in dogs, Revolution should be administered on a monthly basis. In heavy tick infestations, complete efficacy may not be achieved after the first dose. In these cases, one additional dose may be administered two weeks after the previous dose, with monthly dosing continued thereafter.
Nematode Treatment In Cats
For the treatment and control of intestinal hookworm (A. tubaeforme) and roundworm (T. cati) infections, Revolution should be applied once as a single topical dose.
SAFETY:
Revolution has been tested safe in over 100 different pure and mixed breeds of healthy dogs and over 15 different pure and mixed breeds of healthy cats, including pregnant and lactating females, breeding males and females, puppies six weeks of age and older, kittens eight weeks of age and older, and avermectin-sensitive collies. A kitten, estimated to be 5-6 weeks old (0.3 kg), died 8 1/2 hours after receiving a single treatment of Revolution at the recommended dosage. The kitten displayed clinical signs which included muscle spasms, salivation and neurological signs. The kitten was a stray with an unknown history and was malnourished and underweight (see WARNINGS).
DOGS: In safety studies, Revolution was administered at 1, 3, 5, and 10 times the recommended dose to six-week-old puppies, and no adverse reactions were observed. The safety of Revolution administered orally also was tested in case of accidental oral ingestion. Oral administration of Revolution at the recommended topical dose in 5- to 8-month-old beagles did not cause any adverse reactions. In a pre-clinical study selamectin was dosed orally to ivermectin-sensitive collies. Oral administration of 2.5, 10, and 15 mg/kg in this dose escalating study did not cause any adverse reactions; however, eight hours after receiving 5 mg/kg orally, one avermectin-sensitive collie became ataxic for several hours, but did not show any other adverse reactions after receiving subsequent doses of 10 and 15 mg/kg orally. In a topical safety study conducted with avermectin-sensitive collies at 1, 3 and 5 times the recommended dose of Revolution, salivation was observed in all treatment groups, including the vehicle control. Revolution also was administered at 3 times the recommended dose to heartworm infected dogs, and no adverse effects were observed.
CATS: In safety studies, Revolution was applied at 1, 3, 5, and 10 times the recommended dose to six-week-old kittens. No adverse reactions were observed. The safety of Revolution administered orally also was tested in case of accidental oral ingestion. Oral administration of the recommended topical dose of Revolution to cats caused salivation and intermittent vomiting. Revolution also was applied at 4 times the recommended dose to patent heartworm infected cats, and no adverse reactions were observed.
In well-controlled clinical studies, Revolution was used safely in animals receiving other frequently used veterinary products such as vaccines, anthelmintics, antiparasitics, antibiotics, steroids, collars, shampoos and dips.
STORAGE CONDITIONS: Store below 30°C (86°F).
How Supplied
Available in eight separate dose strengths for dogs and cats of different weights (see DOSAGE). Revolution for puppies and kittens is available in cartons containing 3 single dose tubes. Revolution for cats and dogs is available in cartons containing 3 or 6 single dose tubes.
Distributed by: Zoetis Inc., Kalamazoo, MI 49007
www.revolutionpet.com
10309505
NAC No.: 3690134.7

ZOETIS INC.
333 PORTAGE STREET, KALAMAZOO, MI, 49007


Telephone:
 
269-359-4414


Customer Service:
 
888-963-8471


Website:
 
www.zoetis.com





Every effort has been made to ensure the accuracy of the Revolution information published above. However, it remains the responsibility of the readers to familiarize themselves with the product information contained on the US product label or package insert.



Share on GooglePlus
Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Print this page
Email to a friend

Copyright © 2017 North American Compendiums. Updated: 2017-07-10






 





Top 20 Searches


Dog Medications
Cat Medications
Rimadyl Caplets
Temaril Tablets
Vectra 3D
Tresaderm
Horse Medications
Denamarin
Animax Ointment
Beef & Cattle Medications
Zeniquin
Torbutrol Tablets
Clavamox Tablets
Surolan Drops
Vetalog
Depo Medrol
Chicken Medications
Vetropolycin Ointment
Cerenia Injectable
Otomax














Drugs.com Mobile Apps
The easiest way to lookup drug information, identify pills, check interactions and set up your own personal medication records. Available for Android and iOS devices.
Explore Apps











Support

Help Center
Frequent Questions
Sitemap
Contact Us



About

About Drugs.com
Advertising Policy
Content Submissions
Drugs.com Blog



Terms & Privacy

Editorial Policy
Privacy Policy

Terms of Use
Attribution & Citations





Facebook 
Twitter 
Google Plus 
YouTube 
RSS Feed 


Subscribe to receive email notifications whenever new articles are published.




Drugs.com provides accurate and independent information on more than 24,000 prescription drugs, over-the-counter medicines and natural products. This material is provided for educational purposes only and is not intended for medical advice, diagnosis or treatment. Data sources include Micromedex® (updated July 5th, 2017), Cerner Multum™ (updated July 13th, 2017), Wolters Kluwer™ (updated July 5th, 2017) and  others. To view content sources and attributions, please refer to our editorial policy.








Third Party Advertising


We comply with the HONcode standard for trustworthy health information - verify here


Copyright © 2000-2017 Drugs.com. All rights reserved.









Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on GooglePlus
Email to a friend

Hide





















 



Third Rock Ventures Launches REVOLUTION Medicines with $45 Million Series A to Redesign Evolution’s Products to Treat Serious Diseases | Business Wire
























































Third Rock Ventures Launches REVOLUTION Medicines with $45 Million 
      Series A to Redesign Evolution’s Products to Treat Serious Diseases




Company Secures Exclusive License Agreement with University of 
      Illinois






February 04, 2015 07:00 AM Eastern Standard Time



SAN FRANCISCO/REDWOOD CITY, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Third 
      Rock Ventures, LLC today announced the formation of REVOLUTION 
      Medicines, Inc. with a $45 million Series A financing to discover 
      and develop new therapies derived from natural products. REVOLUTION 
      Medicines’ innovative approach reconfigures these complex chemicals of 
      life into best-in-class medicines. Veteran industry leader Mark A. 
      Goldsmith, M.D., Ph.D., is the founding president and chief executive 
      officer of REVOLUTION Medicines. Dr. Goldsmith brings to the company 
      more than 25 years of experience as an academic scientist and senior 
      executive in the biotechnology industry, and is a partner at Third Rock 
      Ventures.
    


      REVOLUTION Medicines builds upon the vision of the company’s founder and 
      scientific advisory board chairman, Martin D. Burke, M.D., Ph.D., 
      professor of chemistry, University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, and 
      Early Career Scientist of the Howard Hughes Medical Institute. Dr. Burke 
      invented a transformative method for synthesizing original compounds 
      that are pharmaceutically optimized analogues of complex natural 
      products. The company has entered into an exclusive license agreement 
      with the University of Illinois to practice and expand this technology, 
      and is pursuing a rapid clinical development path with its lead 
      antifungal program that originated in Dr. Burke’s laboratory.
    

      “With this major advance in chemical synthesis, we now have the 
      opportunity to unlock the full medical benefits of natural products that 
      have been selected through a billion years of evolutionary pressure,” 
      said Dr. Goldsmith. “Marty is a remarkably inventive chemical biologist, 
      and REVOLUTION Medicines is working closely with him in his role as 
      scientific advisory board chairman to exploit his breakthroughs for 
      industrial-scale drug discovery through redesigning complex molecules. 
      Our strategy should produce high-impact treatments for serious 
      infections and non-infectious diseases, among them our lead product 
      candidates for patients with life-threatening fungal infections.”
    

      The arduous process of synthesizing natural products often requires 
      years of trial and error to reconstruct a single chemical scaffold. In 
      contrast, REVOLUTION Medicines’ approach is a rapid, standardized and 
      powerful process for assembling simple “chemical building blocks” into 
      refined natural product-like structures. These optimized compounds have 
      significant potential as best-in-class drug candidates.
    

      REVOLUTION Medicines’ first drug candidates exploit and improve upon the 
      properties of amphotericin B, a powerful, broad-spectrum antifungal 
      compound found in nature that has avoided generating significant drug 
      resistance in 50 years of clinical use. Full therapeutic benefit from 
      this highly efficacious natural compound is significantly compromised by 
      inherent dose-limiting side effects, principally kidney damage. Using 
      the building block synthesis platform to create new molecules, Dr. Burke 
      and his research group overturned decades of scientific dogma and 
      demonstrated that the antifungal efficacy of the amphotericin B scaffold 
      can be separated chemically from the major mechanism that underlies 
      human kidney cell damage. REVOLUTION Medicines is developing novel 
      compounds that leverage the proven therapeutic mechanism for killing 
      fungi while minimizing toxic effects on human cells.
    

      “Professor Burke and his group have demonstrated the power of research 
      at our school to uncover methods and drug candidates that can be 
      enormously impactful on human health,” said Phyllis Wise, Ph.D., 
      chancellor of the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. “As one of 
      the nation’s original land-grant institutions, our mission at the 
      University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign is to serve the public good 
      through learning, discovery and outreach. Third Rock Ventures has 
      launched REVOLUTION Medicines to translate these discoveries into 
      important human benefits.”
    

REVOLUTION Medicines Team


      The REVOLUTION 
      Medicines team brings deep expertise and a track record of building 
      exceptional life sciences companies. In addition to Dr. Goldsmith, 
      founding president and chief executive officer and Dr. Burke, founder 
      and scientific advisory board chairman, the team includes: David 
      Pompliano, Ph.D., founding chief scientific officer, who is a leading 
      drug discovery and development expert who previously led infectious 
      disease research at Merck and GlaxoSmithKline; Peg Horn, J.D., general 
      counsel and senior vice president, corporate development, a seasoned 
      corporate executive with extensive experience in small and large 
      companies; Neil Exter, interim chief business officer, a member of 
      REVOLUTION Medicine’s board of directors and partner at Third Rock 
      Ventures, who brings more than 20 years of experience leading business 
      development and strategy, including service as chief business officer of 
      bluebird bio (NASDAQ: BLUE) and Foundation Medicine (NASDAQ: FMI); and 
      Alexis Borisy, a member of REVOLUTION Medicines board of directors, 
      partner at Third Rock Ventures, and entrepreneur and chemical biologist 
      who brings more than 20 years of experience launching and operating 
      innovative science-based organizations, including Blueprint Medicines, 
      Warp Drive Bio, Foundation Medicine and CombinatoRx.
    

Resources



Video: 
        Dr. Marty Burke explains how his research group breaks down complex 
        chemicals into simple "building blocks”
      

Video: 
        Dr. Marty Burke’s research described at the 109th Meeting 
        of the Advisory Committee to the Francis Collins, M.D., Ph.D., 
        director of the National Institutes of Health (see time stamp 30:35)
      

Synthesis 
        of most polyene natural product motifs using just 12 building blocks 
        and one coupling reaction. Nature Chemistry 2014, 6, 
        484-491. E.M. Woerly, J. Roy & M.D. Burke.
      

C2’-OH 
        of Amphotericin B Plays an Important Role in Binding the Primary 
        Sterol of Human Cells but Not Yeast Cells. J. Am. Chem. Soc. 
        2013, 135, 8488-8491. B.C. Wilcock , M.M. Endo, B.E. Uno & M.D. Burke.
      

Amphotericin 
        primarily kills yeast by simply binding ergosterol. Proc. Natl. 
        Acad. Sci. U.S.A. 2012, Volume 109, 2234-2239. K.C. Gray, D.S. 
        Palacios, I. Dailey, M.M. Endo, B.E. Uno, B.C. Wilcock & M.D. Burke.
      


About Third Rock Ventures


      Third Rock Ventures is the leading healthcare venture firm focused on 
      disruptive areas of science and medicine to discover, launch and build 
      companies that make a dramatic difference in people’s lives. By 
      combining our team’s scientific vision, strategic leadership, 
      operational expertise and innovative deal-making capabilities, we 
      nurture bold ideas that translate into successful business enterprises. 
      Recognizing that the best way to create value for our investors is to 
      create value for patients, our companies are built on a solid foundation 
      of science, medicine, people and business strategy. For more 
      information, please visit the firm’s website at www.thirdrockventures.com.
    




Contacts

      Pure Communications, Inc.Katie Engleman, 910-509-3977Katie@purecommunicationsinc.com
















Release Summary
Third Rock Ventures Launches REVOLUTION Medicines with $45 Million Series A to Redesign Evolution’s Products to Treat Serious Diseases






Contacts

      Pure Communications, Inc.Katie Engleman, 910-509-3977Katie@purecommunicationsinc.com









 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up














	REVOLUTION MEDICINES Trademark of Revolution Medicines, Inc.. Serial Number: 86558324 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Computer & Software Services & Scient...
REVOLUTION MEDICINES










 
Get FREE email alerts













REVOLUTION MEDICINES  Trademark Information
 Revolution Medicines, Inc.
Pharmaceutical research and development; drug discovery services




Perfect for these industries

Computer & Software Services & Scientific Services





Words that describe this mark
pharmaceutical   research   development   drug   discovery   services    
                                    




This is a brand page for the REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark by Revolution Medicines, Inc. 
                                in Redwood City, CA, 94063.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Revolution Medicines, Inc. of the REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark.
                           






On Monday, March 9, 2015,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        REVOLUTION MEDICINES by 
                        Revolution Medicines, Inc., Redwood City, CA  94063.
                        The USPTO has given the REVOLUTION MEDICINES 
                        trademark serial  number of  86558324.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is REGISTERED.
                        The correspondent listed for REVOLUTION MEDICINES is 
                        
                        
                                            TODD BONTEMPS, Esquire of 
                                            COOLEY LLP,  1299 PENNSYLVANIA AVE NW STE 700, WASHINGTON DC 20004-2446 
                                .
                            The REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Computer & Software Services & Scientific Services
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for REVOLUTION MEDICINES 
                            is Pharmaceutical research and development; drug discovery services. 
                            





Word mark:
 REVOLUTION MEDICINES


  Status/Status Date:  


REGISTERED

12/27/2016



  Serial Number:  
86558324


  Filing Date:  
3/9/2015


 Registration Number:  
5110422 


 Registration Date:  
12/27/2016


 Goods and Services: 
Pharmaceutical research and development; drug discovery services


 Mark Description: 
The mark consists of a hexagon that is broken vertically into two parts. Each side is made of three triangles in light green, medium green, and dark green. To the right is the wording "REVOLUTION" with the "R" in light green and the remainder of the letters in black. Below the letters "UTION" is the word "MEDICINES" in light green.


 Type Of Mark: 
Service Mark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
9/8/2015


Last Applicant/Owner:

Revolution Medicines, Inc.Redwood City, CA  94063
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Drawing/Design + Words


 Design Search: 
See Similar Logos >>



                                                    Four or more triangles  (Geometric figures and solids   -   Triangles) see more design...


                                                    Triangles that are completely or partially shaded  (Geometric figures and solids   -   Triangles) see more design...


                                                    Incomplete polygons and polygons made of broken or dotted lines (Geometric figures and solids   -  Polygons (geometric figures with five or more sides)) see more design...


                                                     More than one polygon (Geometric figures and solids   -  Polygons (geometric figures with five or more sides)) see more design...


                                                    Polygons that are completely or partially shaded  (Geometric figures and solids   -  Polygons (geometric figures with five or more sides)) see more design...


                                                    Miscellaneous designs with overall polygon shape (Geometric figures and solids   -  Polygons (geometric figures with five or more sides)) see more design...




Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 ("MEDICINES")


 Correspondent:


TODD BONTEMPS, Esquire
COOLEY LLP
1299 PENNSYLVANIA AVE NW STE 700
WASHINGTON DC 20004-2446






 Use in Commerce Trademark - Applicant has provided proof of use of this mark in commerce to USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (042) - Scientific and technological services and research and design relating thereto; industrial analysis and research services; design and development of computer hardware and software. 


First Use Anywhere: 
3/30/2015


First Use In Commerce: 
3/30/2015





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

12/27/2016
REGISTERED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



TODD BONTEMPS, Esquire


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search revolutionmedicines on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for REVOLUTION MEDICINES 




REVOLUTION MEDICINES is providing Pharmaceutical research and development; drug discovery services.
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 























Revolution



































Company Vision










Harnessing frontier cancer targets
                                    Through exceptional drug discovery
Inspired by Nature's Lessons
Our goal is to discover and develop important new medicines for cancer patients by harnessing the value of frontier oncology targets – proteins that drive the growth of cancers or that control immune responses that can defeat them. Frontier targets have not been drugged successfully before or have been inadequately served by previous drug discovery efforts. Harnessing such targets fully requires advances made possible by our innovative product engine.
Our approach begins with inspiration provided by nature and evolution. Over the billion years of natural selection, nature has generated and made use of thousands of extraordinary small molecule compounds that exert remarkable effects on specific proteins. Many of these compounds were developed as defenses by microbes and their actions are highly instructive more broadly.  Understanding how they interact with cellular targets can reveal valuable insights into the biology underlying the targets and how such targets can be engaged by small molecules. Furthermore, these natural products themselves can reveal chemical insights that can inform the drug discovery process. Hence, we exploit these insights from nature’s lessons to understand frontier cancer targets and to inspire drug discovery approaches that can master them.
To take greatest advantage of evolution’s lessons, our drug discovery toolkit is inspired by the complex chemical space favored by nature, including natural products or fragments of natural products that bind to large, flat ligand binding sites and protein-protein interactions that are typical of many frontier targets and can represent significant hurdles to drug discovery. We exploit this unique toolkit to give us the greatest opportunity to succeed.

Our drug discovery approach is enabled by breakthrough modular synthesis technology, REVBLOCKS ™, that allows us to craft optimal drug candidates that bind to these non-classical target binding sites.  












 











 







Revolution


















About Us









A REVOLUTIONARY Approach in Drug Discovery
REVOLUTION Medicines discovers and develops new drugs that harness the therapeutic potential of frontier oncology targets on behalf of cancer patients. Our innovative product engine draws inspiration from nature and evolution, which offer insights into cancer targets, disease mechanisms and therapeutic approaches. We pay particular attention to natural products that are inherently rich with biological function as a result of natural selection and can inform and guide our discovery and development of small molecules that can modulate these targets.
REVOLUTION Medicines exploits inventions by the company’s lead founder, Martin D. Burke, M.D., Ph.D., professor of chemistry, University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, who developed a transformative method for synthesizing chemical compounds including complex natural products, analogs or original small molecules that are pharmaceutically optimized. REVOLUTION Medicines has entered into an exclusive licensing agreement with the University of Illinois to practice this technology.
REVOLUTION Medicines’ integrated product engine builds upon and expands these modular synthesis methods to power the focused and efficient assembly of simple "chemical building blocks" into refined chemical structures that exhibit optimized pharmacologic properties. In addition, we deploy advanced biologic assays, biophysical approaches and computational methods to enhance our understanding of disease targets and to drive advanced drug discovery.
Headquartered in Redwood City, Calif., at the intersection of Silicon Valley and the birthplace of biotechnology, REVOLUTION Medicines is a private company launched with $70 million in Series A financing from Third Rock Ventures and The Column Group.  


ABOUT US
OUR VALUES
OUR TEAM


















Revolution



































Product Engine









A REVOLUTIONARY Approach in Drug Discovery
Our innovative product engine draws inspiration from nature and evolution, which can be a source of insights into cancer targets, disease mechanisms and therapeutic approaches.  We pay particular attention to natural products that are inherently rich with biological function as a result of natural selection and can inform and guide our discovery and development of small molecules that can modulate such targets. Our use of biologically relevant chemical information from nature depends on our ability to synthesize and modify complex natural products, specific portions of these complex compounds, and entirely original molecules inspired by natural products.
Our REVBLOCKS™ platform builds upon the research of the company’s academic founder, Martin D. Burke, M.D., Ph.D., who invented a transformative method for synthesizing chemical compounds including complex natural products, analogs or original small molecules that are pharmaceutically optimized. REVBLOCKS is a rapid, standardized and powerful process for conducting advanced medicinal chemistry by assembling simple “chemical building blocks” into refined structures that have significant potential as best-in-class drug candidates. REVOLUTION Medicines is thus able to synthesize, modify and improve many complex compounds that would be very challenging or even impossible to modify without this approach. We practice this technology under an exclusive license agreement with the University of Illinois.
In addition to our modular synthesis technology, REVOLUTION Medicines deploys its REVEAL™ platform to help guide design of compounds. REVEAL is a knowledge-driven informatics system designed to recognize advantageous structural and functional properties of scaffolds that can be exploited to engage protein targets. By learning from nature's experience in this way, we can elevate certain preferred compounds or portions of compouds as chemical starting points for optimization as drug candidates that will engage and modulate important disease targets. This computational platform also supports the process of optimization of lead compounds.



PRODUCT ENGINE
REVBLOCKS
REVEAL












 





Revolution



































Antifungal Drug Program








Introduction
Invasive fungal infections have become more prevalent over the past three decades, due in large part to the increasing number of immunocompromised hosts and hospitalized patients with significant underlying diseases. Candida and Aspergillus are the most common causes of invasive fungal infections and, 
							despite the introduction of broad spectrum azoles (e.g., voriconazole) and echinocandins (e.g., caspofungin), morbidity and mortality remain unacceptably high. Indeed, mortality rates from fungal diseases can be as high as 50%, and it is estimated that there are more than a million deaths worldwide annually - more than that caused by tuberculosis or malaria. There has also been a shift in epidemiology with an increase in Candida and Aspergillus spp. resistant to available therapies resulting in the 
							addition of these organisms to the list of qualifying pathogens under the GAIN Act (Generate Anti-Infectives Now) passed by the U.S. Congress to encourage development of anti-infective drugs. There is an urgent need for new, broad spectrum, -cidal antifungal agents with a high barrier to development of 
							resistance.
Amphotericin B (AmB) is a powerful, broad-spectrum antifungal compound found in nature that has remarkably avoided generating significant drug resistance in 50 years of clinical use. Produced by Streptomyces nodosus, a filamentous bacterium, it was discovered as a fungicidal compound in 1955 at the 
							Squibb Institute for Medical Research. This drug is used to treat serious fungal infections, and some cases of protozoan infections, and is included on the World Health Organization's List of Essential Medicines. The chemical structure of AmB is shown below.

The mechanism of action of AmB has been the subject of controversy despite being studied for decades following its introduction. It was proposed to associate with sterol components of lipid bilayers, including natural cell surface membranes, and to self-assemble spontaneously into channels that are 
							permeable to various inorganic ions. Indeed, following the discovery in 1976 of ion channel activity induced by AmB, the prevailing model to explain AmB’s potent fungicidal activity has invoked the formation of these channels on the surfaces of fungi as the cause of loss of vital membrane integrity.
Recent research in the laboratory of Martin Burke, M.D., Ph.D., scientific co-founder of REVOLUTION Medicines, at the University of Illinois has provided striking new data that upend this paradigm. As reported by the Burke laboratory in a series of peer-reviewed scientific articles, AmB was shown for 
							the first time by biophysical means to bind directly to ergosterol as both a necessary and sufficient mechanism of yeast cell killing. The authors concluded that AmB acts as an ergosterol “sponge” that deprives membranes of the key sterol, and that this mechanism is primarily responsible for cell death.
The discovery that binding ergosterol was sufficient for cell killing was critically enabled by synthesis of novel compounds that are based on the AmB chemical backbone but have been deleted of a specific hydroxyl group at position C35. This hydroxyl group was predicted to be required for insertion 
							into membranes and for formation of toxic channels. The new compound (C35deOAmB, see figure below), which would otherwise have been very difficult to produce, was synthesized in the Burke laboratory using the building block synthesis technology that underlies REVOLUTION Medicines’ 
							REVBLOCKS synthesis platform.

C35deOAmB was shown to retain its ability to bind ergosterol but to exhibit no detectable ion channel activity. Importantly, this compound also retained its fungicidal activity, thereby proving that its mechanism of killing is not dependent on the assembly of membrane permeabilizing channels by 
							aggregates of the compound.
Consistent with its dose-limiting toxicity to humans, additional work by the Burke group showed that AmB also directly binds cholesterol, a key constituent of mammalian cell surface membranes. They also found that modification of the C2’ position leads to a derivative that selectively binds ergosterol.
							 This discovery opened the door to rationally designed modifications based on the model of sterol binding to AmB (shown in figure below)). These changes are projected to alter critical allosteric dynamics in AmB that may be necessary for the molecule to accommodate binding to cholesterol. Indeed, several 
							 such derivatives were shown to retain ergosterol binding with only minimal, or even undetectable, residual cholesterol binding. Importantly, these cholesterol-independent compounds exhibited antifungal activity with markedly reduced toxicity to mammalian cells as measured in in vitro assays with human 
							 renal epithelial cells or red blood cells as surrogates. These findings demonstrate that it is possible to separate antifungal activity from toxicity to mammalian cells based on differential binding of species-specific sterols. Additionally, initial studies in murine models of systemic Candida infection 
							 demonstrated marked clearance of pathogenic organisms by these new compounds at dose levels that were well tolerated by the rodent hosts, suggesting that such molecules may have an improved therapeutic index compared to AmB itself.

Subsequent work by the Burke group, working in collaboration with Dr. Susan Lindquist and colleagues at the Whitehead Institute, evaluated some of these compounds designed rationally from the AmB backbone. Experimentally forced selection for yeast that are relatively resistant to these antifungal 
							compounds revealed the same pattern that has been observed previously in selection for AmB resistance: organisms exhibiting relative in vitro resistance to the cholesterol-independent compounds are not pathogenic in vivo, revealing that the emergence to such resistance is coupled to substantial 
							reductions in microbial fitness and associated reduction in pathogenicity.
Collectively, the experimental findings with these compounds reported to date suggest an exciting opportunity and path to engineering and developing new medicines based on the AmB backbone provided by nature. Based on the new mechanistic understanding, such compounds may have improved safety for 
							patients, preserved or increased antifungal activity, and low propensity to select for pathogenic variants that are resistant to the compounds. REVOLUTION Medicines is currently conducting extensive preclinical studies with the aim of qualifying clinical candidate(s) for further development.



AntiFungal Drug Program












 



Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











	REVOLUTION MEDICINES Trademark of Revolution Medicines, Inc.. Serial Number: 86558327 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Pharmaceutical Products
REVOLUTION MEDICINES










 
Get FREE email alerts













REVOLUTION MEDICINES  Trademark Information
 Revolution Medicines, Inc.
Pharmaceutical preparations for the treatment of fungal and bacterial diseases and disorders, immunological diseases and disorders, inflammatory diseases and disorders, endocrinological diseases and disorders, oncological diseases and disorders, metabolic diseases and disorders, pulmonary diseases and disorders, rheumatological diseases and disorders, diabetic diseases and disorders, genetic diseases and disorders, and infectious diseases in h...




Perfect for these industries

Pharmaceutical Products





Words that describe this mark
pharmaceutical   preparations   treatment   fungal   bacterial   diseases   disorders      immunological   diseases   disorders      inflammatory   diseases   disorders      endocrinological   diseases   disorders      oncological   diseases   disorders      metabolic   diseases    
                                    




This is a brand page for the REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark by Revolution Medicines, Inc. 
                                in Redwood City, CA, 94063.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Revolution Medicines, Inc. of the REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark.
                           






On Monday, March 9, 2015,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        REVOLUTION MEDICINES by 
                        Revolution Medicines, Inc., Redwood City, CA  94063.
                        The USPTO has given the REVOLUTION MEDICINES 
                        trademark serial  number of  86558327.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is THIRD EXTENSION - GRANTED.
                        The correspondent listed for REVOLUTION MEDICINES is 
                        
                        
                                            TODD BONTEMPS of 
                                            Cooley Llp,  1299 Pennsylvania Ave NW Ste 700, Washington DC 20004-2446 
                                .
                            The REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Pharmaceutical Products
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for REVOLUTION MEDICINES 
                            is Pharmaceutical preparations for the treatment of fungal and bacterial diseases and disorders, immunological diseases and disorders, inflammatory diseases and disorders, endocrinological diseases and disorders, oncological diseases and disorders, metabolic diseases and disorders, pulmonary diseases and disorders, rheumatological diseases and disorders, diabetic diseases and disorders, genetic diseases and disorders, and infectious diseases in humans. 
                            





Word mark:
 REVOLUTION MEDICINES


  Status/Status Date:  


THIRD EXTENSION - GRANTED

6/21/2017



  Serial Number:  
86558327


  Filing Date:  
3/9/2015


 Registration Number:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Registration Date:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Goods and Services: 
Pharmaceutical preparations for the treatment of fungal and bacterial diseases and disorders, immunological diseases and disorders, inflammatory diseases and disorders, endocrinological diseases and disorders, oncological diseases and disorders, metabolic diseases and disorders, pulmonary diseases and disorders, rheumatological diseases and disorders, diabetic diseases and disorders, genetic diseases and disorders, and infectious diseases in humans


 Mark Description: 
The mark consists of a hexagon that is broken vertically into two parts. Each side is made of three triangles in light green, medium green, and dark green. To the right is the wording "REVOLUTION" with the "R" in light green and the remainder of the letters in black. Below the "UTION" portion is the word "MEDICINES" in light green.


 Type Of Mark: 
TradeMark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
10/27/2015


Last Applicant/Owner:

Revolution Medicines, Inc.Redwood City, CA  94063
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Drawing/Design + Words


 Design Search: 
See Similar Logos >>



                                                    Four or more triangles  (Geometric figures and solids   -   Triangles) see more design...


                                                    Triangles that are completely or partially shaded  (Geometric figures and solids   -   Triangles) see more design...


                                                     More than one polygon (Geometric figures and solids   -  Polygons (geometric figures with five or more sides)) see more design...


                                                    Polygons that are completely or partially shaded  (Geometric figures and solids   -  Polygons (geometric figures with five or more sides)) see more design...


                                                    Miscellaneous designs with overall polygon shape (Geometric figures and solids   -  Polygons (geometric figures with five or more sides)) see more design...




Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 ("MEDICINES")


 Correspondent:


TODD BONTEMPS
Cooley Llp
1299 Pennsylvania Ave NW Ste 700
Washington DC 20004-2446






 Intent to Use Trademark - Applicant has not submitted proof of use in commerce the the USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (005) - Pharmaceutical and veterinary preparations; sanitary preparations for medical purposes; dietetic substances adapted for medical use, food for babies; plasters, materials for dressings; material for stopping teeth, dental wax; disinfectants; preparations for destroying vermin; fungicides, herbicides. 


First Use Anywhere: 
Not provided


First Use In Commerce: 
Not provided





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

6/21/2017
THIRD EXTENSION - GRANTED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



TODD BONTEMPS


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of REVOLUTION MEDICINES trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search revolutionmedicines on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for REVOLUTION MEDICINES 




REVOLUTION MEDICINES is providing Pharmaceutical preparations for the treatment of fungal and bacterial diseases and disorders, immunological diseases and disorders, inflammatory diseases and disorders, endocrinological diseases and disorders, oncological diseases and disorders, metabolic diseases and disorders, pulmonary diseases and disorders, rheumatological diseases and disorders, diabetic diseases and disorders, genetic diseases and disorders, and infectious diseases in humans.
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 




















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started









































Revolution for Dogs, Flea Control




































































800-344-6337




  Call for weekly phone specials!



















VIEW OUR ECATALOG »




SHIPPING INFO »




ABOUT LVS »









Customer Support






MY ACCOUNT




EMAIL SIGNUP





































Home > Dog & Puppy > Heartworm Medications  >  Revolution Rx for Dogs












Revolution Rx for Dogs




Part Number:9797|








 Write a Review








2 Review(s)
5











Manufacturer | 
Zoetis








Once-a-month topical treatmentKills and prevents flea infestationsProtects against heartworm diseaseHelp keep your dog safe from ticks and tick borne diseasesControls ear mite infestationsSafe for dogs 6 weeks or age or older

























 Learn more:  • Heartworm Preventive Comparison Chart • Heartworm Disease in Dogs • Heartworm Disease in Cats  Shipping restrictions apply. Click for details.












 Login to Buy



Please  Login to your account or click here to Register.






Price


                    Your Price:
                    
$41.99










Availability:
In Stock














Choose Options







Supply / Weight









3 Month / Up to 5 lbs (Mauve) 









3 Month / 5.1-10 lbs (Purple) 









3 Month / 10.1-20 lbs (Brown) 









3 Month / 20.1-40 lbs (Red) 









3 Month / 40.1-85 lbs (Teal) 









3 Month / 85.1-130 lbs (Plum) 









6 Month / 5.1-10 lbs (Purple) 









6 Month / 10.1-20 lbs (Brown) 









6 Month / 20.1-40 lbs (Red) 









6 Month / 40.1-85 lbs (Teal) 









6 Month / 85.1-130 lbs (Plum) 










-- PRESCRIPTION METHOD --






-- PRESCRIPTION METHOD -- 
My vet will fax script 
I will mail my orginal script 
I have a refill on file 
My vet will call in my script 
Contact my vet for me 

























































































































































































































































































































































 Add to Gift Registry


































 Write a Review








2 Review(s)
5










Feature:






Manufacturer | 
Zoetis















Description

Customer Reviews

Directions/Dosage



Ingredients



Cautions






Disclaimer(s)




Revolution® is recommended for use in dogs six weeks of age or older and cats eight weeks of age and older for the following parasites and indications:  Dogs: Revolution kills adult fleas and prevents flea eggs from hatching for one month and is indicated for the prevention and control of flea infestations (Ctenocephalides felis), prevention of heartworm disease caused by Dirofilaria immitis, and the treatment and control of ear mite (Otodectes cynotis) infestations. Revolution also is indicated for the treatment and control of sarcoptic mange (Sarcoptes scabiei) and for the control of tick infestations due to American Dog Tick (Dermacentor variabilis).  Prescription items are NON-RETURNABLE and NON-REFUNDABLE.   This product can only be shipped via ground carrier within the contiguous United States. It cannot be shipped to a P.O. Box or via any expedited method that may involve air transport. If you have any questions, please call 800-344-6337.  Back to top 











Revolution dog/puppy parasite drops
Excellent control and according to my vet, the safest product on the market. My puppy weighed only 1.5lbs @ 6 weeks. She had, from the breeder, GI parasites & ear mites & my yard, even after spray twice this past summer was still infested w/fleas. Since tx, Revolution has kept her clear of all her issues. 


                                Did you find this helpful? 
                                

20 of 20 Found Helpful




                                Reviewed by: Grace D-M from Mississippi/ Tennessee.
                                


                                on 1/19/2015
                            
 5/5 






Education consultant
This is the best product that has kept my dog healthy.


                                Did you find this helpful? 
                                

18 of 18 Found Helpful




                                Reviewed by: Connie Reza from 12846 Covey Lane.
                                


                                on 7/12/2013
                            
 5/5 















DOSAGE: The recommended minimum dose is 2.7 mg selamectin per pound (6 mg/kg) of body weight.  Administer the entire contents of a single dose tube (or two tubes used in combination for dogs weighing over 130 pounds) of Revolution topically in accordance with the following tables. (see ADMINISTRATION for the recommended treatment intervals).    Cats (lbs) Package              color mg per tube Potency              (mg/mL) Administered              volume (mL)   Up to 5 Mauve 15 mg 60 0.25   5.1-15 Blue 45 mg 60 0.75    For cats over 15 lbs use the appropriate combination of tubes.    Dogs (lbs) Package              color mg per tube Potency              (mg/mL) Administered              volume (mL)   Up to 5 Mauve 15 mg 60 0.25   5.1-10 Purple 30 mg 120 0.25   10.1-20 Brown 60 mg 120 0.5   20.1-40 Red 120 mg 120 1.0   40.1-85 Teal 240 mg 120 2.0   85.1-130 Plum 120 mg + 240 mg* 120 3.0    *Two tubes used in combination. For dogs over 130 lbs use the appropriate combination of tubes. Recommended for use in dogs 6 weeks of age and older and in cats 8 weeks of age and older. ADMINISTRATION:  A veterinarian or veterinary technician should demonstrate or instruct the pet owner regarding the appropriate technique for applying Revolution topically to dogs and cats prior to first use. Firmly press the cap down to puncture the seal on the Revolution tube; a clicking sound will confirm that the cap has successfully punctured the seal. Remove the cap and check to ensure that the tip of the tube is open. To administer the product, part the hair on the back of the animal at the base of the neck in front of the shoulder blades until the skin is visible. Place the tip of the tube on the skin and squeeze the tube 3 or 4 times to empty its entire contents directly onto the skin in one spot. Keeping the tube squeezed, drag it away from the liquid and lift to remove. Check the tube to ensure that it is empty. Do not massage the product into the skin. Due to alcohol content, do not apply to broken skin. Avoid contact between the product and fingers. Do not apply when the haircoat is wet. Bathing or shampooing the animal 2 or more hours after treatment will not reduce the effectiveness of Revolution. Stiff hair, clumping of hair, hair discoloration, or a slight powdery residue may be observed at the treatment site in some animals. These effects are temporary and do not affect the safety or effectiveness of the product. Discard empty tubes in your ordinary household refuse. Flea Control in Dogs and Cats For the prevention and control of flea infestations, Revolution should be administered at monthly intervals throughout the flea season, starting one month before fleas become active. In controlled laboratory studies >98% of fleas were killed within 36 hours. Results of clinical field studies using Revolution monthly demonstrated >90% control of flea infestations within 30 days of the first dose. Dogs and cats treated with Revolution, including those with pre-existing flea allergy dermatitis, showed improvement in clinical signs associated with fleas as a direct result of eliminating the fleas from the animals and their environment.  If the dog or cat is already infested with fleas when the first dose of Revolution is administered, adult fleas on the animal are killed and no viable fleas hatch from eggs after the first administration. However, an environmental infestation of fleas may persist for a short time after beginning treatment with Revolution because of the emergence of adult fleas from pupae.  Heartworm Prevention in Dogs and Cats For the prevention of heartworm disease, Revolution must be administered on a monthly basis. Revolution may be administered year-round or at least within one month after the animal's first exposure to mosquitoes and monthly thereafter until the end of the mosquito season. The final dose must be given within one month after the last exposure to mosquitoes. If a dose is missed and a monthly interval between dosing is exceeded then immediate administration of Revolution and resumption of monthly dosing will minimize the opportunity for the development of adult heartworms. When replacing another heartworm preventive product in a heartworm disease prevention program, the first dose of Revolution must be given within a month of the last dose of the former medication.  Selamectin, the active ingredient in Revolution, is a macrocyclic lactone compound. These compounds effectively prevent the development of adult heartworms when administered to dogs and cats within one month of exposure to infective (L3) Dirofilaria immitis larvae. Efficacy of macrocyclic lactones decreases below 100% in dogs, however, if first administered >2 months after exposure to infective larvae. Thus, in heartworm endemic regions, delaying initiation of heartworm prevention using Revolution beyond 2 months of first exposure to infective larvae (e.g., starting puppies and kittens at >8 weeks of age), or gaps of >2 months in the administration of Revolution during periods of heartworm transmission, increases the risk of the animal acquiring heartworms. Animals with unknown heartworm history that test negative for heartworms prior to the initiation of Revolution may be harboring pre-patent infections at the time Revolution was started. Testing such animals 3-4 months after initiation of Revolution would be necessary to confirm their negative heartworm status.  At the discretion of the veterinarian, cats =6 months of age may be tested to determine the presence of existing heartworm infections before beginning treatment with Revolution. Cats already infected with adult heartworms can be given Revolution monthly to prevent further infections.  Ear Mite Treatment in Dogs and Cats For the treatment of ear mite (O. cynotis) infestations in dogs and cats, Revolution should be administered once as a single topical dose. A second monthly dose may be required in some dogs. Monthly use of Revolution will control any subsequent ear mite infestations. In the clinical field trials ears were not cleaned, and many animals still had debris in their ears after the second dose. Cleansing of the infested ears is recommended to remove the debris.  Sarcoptic Mange Treatment in Dogs For the treatment of sarcoptic mange (S. scabiei) in dogs, Revolution should be administered once as a single topical dose. A second monthly dose may be required in some dogs. Monthly use of Revolution will control any subsequent sarcoptic mange mite infestations. Because of the difficulty in finding sarcoptic mange mites on skin scrapings, effectiveness assessments also were based on resolution of clinical signs. Resolution of the pruritus associated with the mite infestations was observed in approximately 50% of the dogs 30 days after the first treatment and in approximately 90% of the dogs 30 days after the second monthly treatment.  Tick Control in Dogs For the control of tick (Dermacentor variabilis) infestations in dogs, Revolution should be administered on a monthly basis. In heavy tick infestations, complete efficacy may not be achieved after the first dose. In these cases, one additional dose may be administered two weeks after the previous dose, with monthly dosing continued thereafter.  Nematode Treatment in Cats For the treatment of intestinal hookworm (A. tubaeforme) and roundworm (T. cati) infections, Revolution should be applied once as a single topical dose.


Active Ingredient: Selamectin


CAUTION: US Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian. WARNINGS Not for human use. Keep out of the reach of children. In humans, Revolution may be irritating to skin and eyes. Reactions such as hives, itching and skin redness have been reported in humans in rare instances. Individuals with known hypersensitivity to Revolution should use the product with caution or consult a health care professional. Revolution contains isopropyl alcohol and the preservative butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT). Wash hands after use and wash off any product in contact with the skin immediately with soap and water. If contact with eyes occurs, then flush eyes copiously with water. In case of ingestion by a human, contact a physician immediately. The material safety data sheet (MSDS) provides more detailed occupational safety information. For a copy of the MSDS or to report adverse reactions attributable to exposure to this product, call 1-800-366-5288.  Flammable - Keep away from heat, sparks, open flames or other sources of ignition.  Do not use in sick, debilitated or underweight animals.  PRECAUTIONS: Prior to administration of Revolution, dogs should be tested for existing heartworm infections. At the discretion of the veterinarian, infected dogs should be treated to remove adult heartworms. Revolution is not effective against adult D. immitis and, while the number of circulating microfilariae may decrease following treatment, Revolution is not effective for microfilariae clearance.  Hypersensitivity reactions have not been observed in dogs with patent heartworm infections administered three times the recommended dose of Revolution. Higher doses were not tested.











PrescriptionThis item requires a valid prescription from a licensed veterinarian.








You Might Also Like





Earthborn Holistic Great Plains Feast Natural Dog Food, 5 lbs




Your Price: $24.99
                    

In Stock 








Bags on Board Dispensers




Your Price: $3.75
                    

In Stock 





  






Browse Similar Items




 Dog & Puppy > Wormers
 Dog & Puppy > Flea & Tick > Topicals
 Pet Pharmacy > A - Z > R
 Pet Pharmacy > Ear & Skin
 Pet Pharmacy > Flea and Tick Solutions
 Pet Pharmacy > Heartworm Preventatives
 Pet Pharmacy > Wormers & Internal Parasite















            As a licensed pharmacy, we are required to collect selected health and safety information on your pet.
To process your prescription request, we require your veterinarian and pet information.

First Let's Find Your Veterinarian/Clinic (Required)



Search for your veterinarian by Zip Code
Enter the zip code of your veterinarian, if your vet is not listed, please choose, "Not Found (I will add)."
            Zip Code of Vet:
            
Zip Search


Select State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York

North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania

Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont

Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming



**Please note we are unable to fulfill prescription orders to the state of North Carolina**

If you can't find your vet, try searching by state.


Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York

North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania

Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont

Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming




Ok
Cancel

Find your veterinarian from the drop down menu or choose "Not Found (I will add), then Click Ok to proceed.



Pet Information
Please note that your pet's health is our first priority. Please complete the below information. Our staff will review your pet's medication needs and process your prescription order request.
Fields with an * (asterisk) are required to add this product to your cart.





Pet Name: *  

Owner Name: * 


Type of Pet: *

--Pet Type--
Dog
Cat
Bird (Caged)
Fish (Aquarium)
Fish (Pond)
Reptile
Ferret
Small Animal
Horse
Farm Animal

Breed: *

First Select Type of Pet

Other 


                Gender: *  
                Male  
                Female
                    
                Birthday: * 
Weight (lbs): * 

 No
 Yes
                - Is your pet Neutered or Spayed? *
                
 No
 Yes
                - Is your pet pregnant? *
                
 No
 Yes
                - Has your pet had an allergic or other reaction to any medications? * (put in comments)
                
 No
 Yes
                - Is your pet taking any medications not purchased through us? * (including OTC and herbal)
                
 No
 Yes
                - Does your pet have any medical conditions? *
            

                Enter Comments below


Veterinarian Information
Our customer service department will contact your vet/clinic for the necessary prescription.



Vet Clinic: *

Vet's Name: *



Address: *

Vet Phone: *
(999) 999-9999


Address:

FAX Number: *

(999) 999-9999
                        


City: *



State: *


Change
Zip: * 



Click Save to proceed. Selecting cancel or clicking the X will clear the form.

Save
Delete
Cancel



















Information



Categories


Dog & Puppy
Cat & Kitten
Pet Pharmacy
Vaccines & Medical Supplies
Large Animal
Grooming Supplies
Medications & Supplements
Aquatic
Other Pet
Human Health
Sales & Special Deals
Pet's Choice Pharmaceuticals
Brands & Manufacturers
Made in the USA
SAVE on Anxiety Relief Products
My Favorite Things - Holiday Treats, Toys, and More






































Revolution



















Harnessing frontier cancer targetsthrough exceptional drug discoveryInspired by nature’s lessons








WHO ARE WE?
REVOLUTION Medicines is an innovative and dynamic organization of expert cellular, structural and computational biologists, medicinal and synthetic chemists, pharmacologists, engineers and business executives working together to discover and develop exciting new medicines that harness frontier oncology targets. Read more about our exceptional approach to drug discovery that is inspired by nature and evolution. Read More. 

PRESS RELEASES
March 20, 2017
						REVOLUTION Medicines Appoints Cancer Leader Dr. Stephen Kelsey as President of Research and Development

READ THE PRESS RELEASE >
December 20, 2016
						REVOLUTION Medicines Raises Additional $25 Million in Series A Financing
READ THE PRESS RELEASE >



Revolution Medicines Named a 2015 "Fierce 15" Biotech Company


Read the Press Release
Read the Story from FierceBiotech











 






Revolution


















Our Team








A PROVEN LEADERSHIP TEAM
The REVOLUTION Medicines team consists of accomplished leaders in building and operating exceptional life science companies.
Management Team

            Mark A. Goldsmith, M.D., Ph.D.            

            Founding President, Chief Executive Officer and Board Director            



Mark grew up around academic medical centers and knew early on that he would devote his professional life to medical science on behalf of patients. After studying biology and science in human affairs at Princeton University, he pursued a dual career in clinical medicine and scientific research through the Medical Scientist Training Program at the University of California San Francisco (UCSF). After postgraduate training at the Brigham and Women’s Hospital/Harvard Medical School and UCSF, Mark joined the faculty of the UCSF School of Medicine, led a dynamic research laboratory within the Gladstone Institute of Virology and Immunology focused on the pathogenesis of and discovery of new treatments for life-threatening viral diseases, and taught and practiced medicine at the San Francisco General Hospital/UCSF. He co-authored 85 scientific publications and is co-inventor on multiple issued patents and applications. He also served as assistant director of the Gladstone Institute of Virology and Immunology and was consultant and collaborator to a variety of small and large biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies.
Mark has also been active in business since childhood, negotiating his first significant technology deal while a graduate student. After a productive career in academia, he was recruited to the private sector, where he served in senior management roles in private and public biotechnology companies, including Genencor International and Constellation Pharmaceuticals, where he drove the development of an industry-leading strategic alliance with Genentech, a member of the Roche Group. Prior to REVOLUTION Medicines, he served as chief executive officer of four companies spanning early discovery through full development. He also served as senior executive-in-residence at Prospect Venture Partners. In 2012, Mark joined Third Rock Ventures full-time to lead its West Coast operations and design, launch and build new biotech companies. As partner, he led the collaboration with David Pompliano, Marty Burke and others that gave rise to REVOLUTION Medicines. In 2015, Mark transitioned into a part-time venture partner position at Third Rock Ventures so that he could focus on building and leading REVOLUTION Medicines as its full-time CEO.
Mark holds an A.B. from Princeton University and an M.D. and Ph.D. in microbiology and immunology from UCSF. In addition to his role at REVOLUTION Medicines, he serves as chairman of the board for Constellation Pharmaceuticals and a board director for Igenica Biotherapeutics. 






            Stephen (Steve) Kelsey, M.D.            

            President, Research and Development            



Realizing he wasn’t good enough to make a career out of playing rugby or soccer Steve went to medical school. Training as an academic hematologic oncologist in London and working as a clinician scientist at Barts and the London before joining the pharmaceutical industry in 2000, Steve was always motivated to have science drive the discovery of novel therapies. In London, he ran a clinical practice treating patients with leukemias and lymphomas in a research-focused environment, ran a research laboratory doing both basic and translational research and taught hematology to medical students. After two years of leading the clinical development of Sutent® for Pharmacia/SUGEN, he joined Genentech where he became vice president of hematology/oncology, playing a significant role in the development of key products such as Perjeta®, Kadcyla® and Erivedge® as well as other molecules in the company’s oncology portfolio. He then led the development of imetelstat, a first-in-class telomerase inhibitor, at Geron where he served as head of research and development and chief medical officer. Following his time at Geron, Steve served as president of Onkaido Therapeutics, a Moderna Venture focusing on discovery and development of mRNA therapeutics for cancer. During his 17 years in the biotechnology industry, Steve has worked with small molecules, antibodies, antibody-drug conjugates, DNA oligonucleotides and mRNA platforms and has driven multiple industry and industry-academia collaborations as part of the mission to provide better drugs for patients with cancer. He has a passion for building and leading high-functioning teams doing groundbreaking cancer research.
Steve graduated with bachelor of medicine and bachelor of surgery degrees (MB ChB) and doctorate of medicine (M.D.) from the University of Birmingham, U.K. He is a fellow of both the Royal College of Physicians (FRCP) of London and the Royal College of Pathologists (FRCPath), U.K. He has over 100 peer-reviewed publications spanning cell biology, drug discovery, drug development and patient care, and is a named inventor on several patents. He now watches more soccer than he plays. 






            Margaret (Peg) Horn, J.D.            

            Executive Vice President and General Counsel            



Peg initially studied pharmacy, but shortly into that five-year educational program decided to advance her education by attending either medical or law school. A lawyer-professor at her pharmacy school tailored an independent legal study course for her, sealing her fate. She completed pharmacy school and then studied law at Villanova Law School. While still in law school, she worked part-time in DuPont’s legal department and subsequently joined the company counseling its pharmaceutical division. During her tenure there, she set a pharmaceutical division record for most patent applications filed in one month (12). 
Led by an entrepreneurial spirit and a desire to see more of the country, she moved to San Francisco. Once there, she embarked on a 25-year adventure in biotechnology, working at both large/public companies (Genencor International and Kosan Biosciences) and small, privately held companies (Cogentus and ProLynx). Through years of corporate experience, international business transactions and worldwide litigation, Peg’s role evolved from patent counsel to general counsel and secretary. At Genencor, she led the legal effort for its IPO (in 2000) and later a multiparty M&A process that resulted in the company’s privatization and acquisition by a multinational conglomerate. Throughout her career, Peg has held multiple senior vice president positions in legal, business and corporate development.
Peg holds a B.S. in pharmacy and a J.D., as well as an executive M.B.A. She is a member of the Pennsylvania and California bars and is a registered patent attorney with the U.S. Patent & Trademark Office. She is a registered pharmacist in Pennsylvania. 






            Adrian Gill, Ph.D.            

            Vice President, Medicinal Chemistry            



Adrian aspires to not only be a great medicinal chemistry leader, but a leader of great medicinal chemists. Adrian has over 20 years experience in roles of increasing scientific responsibility and across a diverse range of disease areas in both large pharma and biotech environments, having worked previously for Roche, Astex Therapeutics and more recently, AstraZeneca where he has been the head of medicinal chemistry for the CVMD iMed.
During his career to date, Adrian has been heavily involved in the identification of over 15 clinical candidates across a variety of disease areas including AT7519 and AT9283, which are in Phase 2 development for a range of human cancers, and AZD4017 for the treatment of diabetes and obesity. Adrian was also a core member of the cell cycle kinase alliance between Astex and Novartis that ultimately led to the discovery of LEE001 (ribociclib), the CDK4/6 inhibitor recently approved by the FDA for the treatment of HR+/HER2- advanced breast cancer. In addition, Adrian has authored 20 publications in peer-reviewed journals and is a named inventor on 27 small molecule patent applications. Adrian received his Ph.D. from the University of Sussex, U.K. in synthetic methodology towards the total synthesis of rapamycin and has a bachelor’s degree in applied chemistry from the University of Salford, U.K. 






            Walter (Wally) Reiher, Ph.D.             

            Vice President, Information Sciences            



Wally has spent the last 30 years leveraging technology to deliver insights, foster collaboration, enhance business processes and improve efficiency. He played a key role in the early development of a number of molecular modeling software companies and did research in computational chemistry as an independent contractor at Sterling Winthrop, Eastman Kodak, and Sanofi.
Seeking a broader impact on research, Wally moved into research informatics, leading the implementation of decision support systems for drug discovery at Chiron, Affymax and Exelixis. Most recently, he held the position of vice president of information technology (IT) at Exelixis, where he delivered a number of major infrastructure projects, including the successful re-implementation of the company’s SAP ERP system.
Wally earned his Ph.D. in computational chemistry from Harvard University in the laboratory of Martin Karplus, 2013 Nobel Laureate in Chemistry. He holds a bachelor’s degree in chemistry from the University of California, San Diego.
  






            Jan Smith, Ph.D.             

            Vice President, Biology            



Jan is an experienced molecular pharmacologist with a focus in small molecule drug discovery across diverse target classes and therapeutic areas including CNS, gastrointestinal and respiratory diseases. She has 20 years of research and development experience from Theravance, and prior to that, Roche, leading the advancement of several novel drug candidates through discovery into early clinical Phase 1/2 development. Jan conducted postdoctoral research at the University of California, Irvine and at the Sandoz Institute for Medical Research, London, U.K. 
Jan has authored over 30 publications in peer-reviewed journals. She received her Ph.D. from University of Cambridge, U.K. and her bachelor's degree in biochemistry from University of Bath, U.K. 






            Luan M. Wilfong            

            Vice President, Human Resources            



Luan enjoys working with people and building great teams. She knows it takes excellent leadership, ongoing collaboration and an engaging environment to build a successful organization and culture. Early in her career, with an economics degree fresh in hand, she was offered a position in a private banking training program with a financial services company. Instead, with the desire to learn about growing strong teams within an organization, she requested the operations/human resources program. From the financial services industry, she transitioned into technology, and eventually into biotechnology, joining Gilead Sciences where she oversaw talent acquisition by directly recruiting for the scientific and clinical functions, led the compensation and employee benefits programs, and managed the human resources due diligence and task integration group for an early acquisition target.
Since her work at Gilead Sciences, Luan has run her own full-service human resources consulting firm, working with numerous organizations across biotechnology, public health, non-profit and high technology fields. This work included growing their staff, coaching their leaders on the importance of leadership and communication, and implementing key human resources functions and processes for their unique business cultures. Luan has also held executive human resources roles, most recently with Audience, Inc., where she was vice president of human resources, leading the function from the pre-IPO stage through an IPO.
Luan received her professional coaching certification through New Ventures West and holds an economics degree from Santa Clara University and a master’s degree in business administration from Golden Gate University. Luan continues to read and study the art of building exceptional teams and cultures.  





Academic Founders

            Martin Burke, M.D., Ph.D.            

            Co-Founder and Scientific Advisory Board Chairman            



Marty grew up dreaming of becoming a doctor or a major league baseball player. The Orioles never called, but Johns Hopkins University did, and so he jumped at the chance. At Hopkins he also discovered a passion for chemistry and its interface with human health. So he next moved to Boston/Cambridge to pursue science and medicine in parallel at Harvard Medical School, Harvard University and MIT. He is now Professor of Chemistry at the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. Marty’s lab is pioneering the development of molecular prosthetics, small molecules that serve as functional surrogates for missing proteins. To enable this research, he has developed a powerful Lego-like approach for making small molecules involving the iterative assembly of MIDA boronate building blocks, an approach that underlies REVOLUTION Medicines’ product engine. Leveraging this platform, his group has synthesized, understood, and/or improved a variety of complex natural products that perform protein-like functions. This includes discovering the mechanism of action of amphotericin B and an atomistic roadmap to improving its therapeutic index.
Marty is the recipient of a number of honors and awards, including the Thieme IUPAC Prize in Synthetic Organic Chemistry, the IOCF Lectureship Award, the Hirata Memorial Gold Medal from Japan, the Early Career Scientist Award from the Howard Hughes Medical Institute, the American Chemical Society Kavli Foundation Emerging Leader in Chemistry Lecturer, the American Chemical Society Elias J. Corey Award for Outstanding Original Contribution in Organic Synthesis by a Young Investigator, the American Chemical Society Arthur C. Cope Scholar Award, the UIUC Innovation Discovery Award, the Novartis Chemistry Lectureship, the Arnold and Mabel Beckman Foundation Young Investigator Award, a Sloan Foundation Research Fellowship, an NSF CAREER Award, the Dreyfus Foundation New Faculty Award, the Bristol-Myers Squibb Unrestricted Research Grant in Synthetic Organic Chemistry, the Eli Lilly Grantee Award, the Amgen Young Investigator Award, the AstraZeneca Excellence in Chemistry Award, and he has been named "one of the world's 35 top innovators under age 35" by MIT Technology Review.
He holds a B.A. from Johns Hopkins University, Ph.D. from Harvard University, and M.D. from Harvard Medical School and MIT. 






            Michael Fischbach, Ph.D.             

            Co-founder and Scientific Advisory Board Member            



With an interest in improving human health through drug discovery, Michael entered the graduate program in chemistry at Harvard. Surrounded by top chemistry talent, Michael became convinced that microorganisms were the best chemists on the planet and devoted the rest of his graduate career to studying how they go about their trade.
Michael is currently an associate professor in the department of bioengineering and therapeutic sciences at University of California, San Francisco and a member of the California Institute for Quantitative Biosciences. The Fischbach group crunches big data to predict which microorganisms are making what molecules where, and uses a combination of microbiology, synthetic biology and chemistry to purify the molecules and characterize the role they play in human biology and disease. Previously, he was an independent fellow at Massachusetts General Hospital coordinating a collaborative effort based at the Broad Institute to develop genomics-based approaches to the discovery of small molecules from microbes.
Michael is a recipient of numerous awards including the NIH Director's New Innovator Award, a Fellowship for Science and Engineering from the David and Lucille Packard Foundation, a Medical Research Award from the W.M. Keck Foundation, a Burroughs Wellcome Fund Investigators in the Pathogenesis of Infectious Disease Award, the Byers Award in basic science, a Glenn Award for Research in Biological Mechanisms of Aging, and the Young Investigator Grant for Probiotics Research from the Global Probiotics Council.
Michael is a member of the scientific advisory boards of NGM Biopharmaceuticals and Symbiota, and a member of the board of directors of Achaogen. 






            Kevan Shokat, Ph.D.            

            Co-founder and Scientific Advisory Board Member            



Kevan is professor and chair of the department of cellular and molecular pharmacology at the University of California, San Francisco and professor of chemistry at the University of California, Berkeley. He is an investigator of the Howard Hughes Medical Institute and a member of the National Academy of Sciences and the Institute of Medicine.
Kevan is a pioneer in the development of chemical methods for investigating cellular signal transduction pathways—with a particular focus on protein kinases and lipid kinases. His laboratory uses a combination of chemical synthesis and protein engineering to create uniquely traceable and regulatable kinases, allowing the function of more than 100 different kinases to be uncovered across all disease areas including oncology, metabolism and infectious disease.
Kevan has received numerous awards for his work, including being named a Fellow of the Pew Foundation, Searle Foundation, Sloan Foundation, Glaxo-Wellcome Foundation and the Cotrell Foundation. He has also received the Eli Lilly Award, given to the most promising biological chemist in the country under the age of 37. 
He is a founder of Intellikine (acquired by Takeda) and Cellular Genomics (acquired by Gilead), co-founder of Araxes Pharmaceuticals, eFFECTOR Therapeutics and Mitokinin, LLC and a scientific advisor at Kura Oncology. 
Kevan received his B.S. in Chemistry from Reed College and his Ph.D. in Organic Chemistry from the University of California, Berkeley.
  





Advisors

            Julian Adams, Ph.D.            

            Senior Advisor and Scientific Advisory Board Member            



Julian is president, research and development at Infinity Pharmaceuticals. Prior to Infinity he was the senior vice president, drug discovery and development at Millennium Pharmaceuticals. He is a successful drug hunter having discovered and developed Velcade® (bortezomib), a proteasome inhibitor for cancer therapy while at ProScript Inc. (acquired by Millennium Pharmaecuticals). Earlier in his career, while at Boehring Ingelheim, he discovered the drug Viramune® (nevirapine) for HIV. 
Julian has received many awards, including the 2012 Warren Alpert Foundation Prize for his role in the discovery and development of bortezomib, the 2012 C. Chester Stock Award Lectureship from Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center, and the 2001 Ribbon of Hope Award for Velcade® from the International Myeloma Foundation. He is an inventor on more than 40 patents and has authored over 100 papers and book chapters in peer-reviewed journals. Julian is on the board of directors of Warp Drive Bio and the Princess Margaret Cancer Foundation and is on the scientific advisory boards of Cleave Biosciences and Stand Up to Cancer.
Julian received his B.S. from McGill University and his Ph.D. from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology in the field of synthetic organic chemistry.  
  






            Trever Bivona, M.D., Ph.D.            

            Senior Advisor and Scientific Advisory Board Member            



Trever is an associate professor at the University of California, San Francisco. He is a medical oncologist with a Ph.D. in cell and molecular biology. He maintains an active academic clinical practice and leads a basic and translational research laboratory focused on cancer genetics, precision medicine, and the molecular basis of targeted therapy response and resistance. Trever’s research has led to the discovery of several mechanisms of resistance to EGFR-targeted therapy, BRAF- and MEK-targeted therapy, and ALK-targeted therapy in lung and other cancers. 
Trever is the recipient of numerous awards including the NIH Director’s New Innovator Award, the Pew-Stewert Scholar Award, the Searle Scholars Award, the Doris Duke Clinical Scientist Development Award and is an elected member of the American Society for Clinical Investigation.
Trever attended the New York University School of Medicine where he received his M.D. and Ph.D. 






            Eric Gordon, Ph.D.             

            Senior Advisor and Scientific Advisory Board Member             



Eric's mother was very afraid of the chemistry set he received as a gift. "This must be powerful stuff," Eric concluded. Thus, Eric began a life-long love affair with chemistry, drug discovery and chasing innovation.
Eric became a well-known medicinal chemist, a senior drug discovery executive, biotech entrepreneur, venture capital investor, science-stage biotech consultant, and consulting Stanford professor. He now has 40 years of experience in the pharmaceutical industry (18), biotech startups (10), venture investing (11) and academia (2) and has had close involvement in the discovery/development of five approved drugs (plus three drugs in Phase 3 development), and has participated in the founding/co-founding five companies, two of which were sold to big pharma.
Eric is an accepted authority on medicinal chemistry, antibiotic / natural product chemistry and creating drugs through enzyme inhibition. He has authored more than 200 scientific manuscripts and U.S. patents, and portions of three books, including editing a comprehensive book on combinatorial chemistry. He is the senior author of two manuscripts, which during 1994-1996, were the most frequently cited chemistry papers in the world. For the 32-year period 1975-2007, these two papers were the number two and three most cited papers to appear in Journal of Medicinal-Chemistry.
In 1997 he was elected a Fellow of the American Association for the Advancement of Science (AAAS). He received his Ph.D. and M.S. in medicinal chemistry from the University of Wisconsin in Madison and conducted post-doctoral work at Yale University. Eric is also a practicing artist and is awaiting his first exhibit in March. He is a lifelong Yankee fan, but is old enough to have attended Woodstock, the Beatles concert at Shea Stadium in 1965 and the 1968 Democratic Convention in Chicago. 






            John Kuriyan, Ph.D.            

            Senior Advisor and Scientific Advisory Board Member            



John is a professor of biochemistry & molecular biology in the department of molecular & cell biology at the University of California, Berkeley. He is a Howard Hughes Investigator, a member of the National Academy of Sciences, and was elected a Foreign Member of the Royal Society, London (2015). John’s research focuses on the structure and mechanism of the enzymes and molecular switches that carry out cellular signal transduction.  
John is the recipient of many awards, including the 2005 Richard Lounsbery Award, US National Academy of Science and the 2009 Merck Award, American Society of Biochemistry and Molecular Biology for his contributions to structural biology. He is an academic founder of Nurix Pharmaceuticals and a member of the Advisory Board of Carmot Therapeutics and Amgen, Inc.  
John received his B.S. from Juniata College and his Ph.D. from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. 






            David Pompliano, Ph.D.            

            Founding Chief Scientific Officer and Advisor            



The desire to turn the technology of the futuristic science fiction stories that David read as a boy into reality compelled him into a life of science. David studied physical and bioorganic chemistry as a graduate student, before finding his true passion -- how evolution acts at the molecular level -- as an enzymology and molecular biology postdoctoral in Jeremy Knowles’ lab. Most of his career has been spent devising new ways to find or to design novel compounds that are not cross-resistant with existing therapeutic agents.
David has served as a senior pharmaceutical executive at GlaxoSmithKline and Merck, where he led drug discovery teams that produced preclinical credentials for more than 30 development candidates and four approved therapies, including the anti-infective Altabax and oncology drugs Tykerb, Votrient and Promacta. He has also been devoted to discovering cost-effective medicines for diseases of the developing world, for which he was recognized with GlaxoSmithKline’s highest honor, the Corporate Executive Team Leadership Award. Subsequently he served as chief executive officer of BioLeap, a venture capital-backed discovery stage platform technology company.
In 2013, he joined Third Rock Ventures as entrepreneur-in-residence to design and build exceptional companies that apply the science of human-microbe interactions to discover and deliver new medicines and diagnostic tools. During this time, he initiated a project that led to REVOLUTION Medicines and played a key role in its conceptualization, design and launch.
David holds a B.S. from the University of Virginia and a Ph.D. in chemistry from Stanford University, and was a National Institutes of Health postdoctoral fellow at Harvard University. As principal and owner of Sanderling Consulting LLC, he advised clients on drug discovery and development strategy and process, and serves on the scientific advisory boards of several biotechnology companies, philanthropies and governmental organizations. 





Board of Directors

            Alexis Borisy            

            Partner, Third Rock Ventures            



Alexis grew up in Madison, Wisconsin, deeply embedded in the lab from a young age, at least if that includes sticking your finger in the vortex machines. Wanting to invent matter-antimatter propulsion, Alexis first started on the path of physics, but then fell in love with biology, chemistry and entrepreneurship. A successful serial company builder with more than 20 years of experience launching and operating innovative science-based organizations, Alexis is now a partner and integral member of Third Rock Ventures, and focuses on the formation, development and strategy of new companies. He has played key roles in launching and building several of Third Rock's portfolio companies including, board member and former interim CEO of Blueprint Medicines, board member at Editas Medicine, chairman of the board and former interim CEO at Warp Drive Bio, and co-founder, former interim CEO and chairman of the board at Foundation Medicine. Prior to joining Third Rock Ventures, Alexis founded CombinatoRx in 2000, serving as its chief executive officer and bringing the company public on NASDAQ. He has raised more than $1 billion in financing and business development deals, and has authored numerous scientific papers and patents. He was honored as the MIT Technology Review Innovator of the Year, the New England Entrepreneur of the Year in Life Sciences and as a Presidential Scholar. He serves on the board of the National Venture Capital Association, has served on the board of the Biotechnology Industry Organization and is a trustee at the Boston Museum of Science.
Alexis holds a B.S. in chemistry from the University of Chicago, and completed his graduate training in chemistry and chemical biology as a Howard Hughes Predoctoral Fellow in the laboratory of Dr. Stuart Schreiber at Harvard University. 






            Larry Lasky, Ph.D.            

            Partner, The Column Group            



Larry Lasky, Ph.D., a partner at The Column Group since 2014, has been an influential scientist in biotechnology for over 35 years. He was a founding scientist of Genetics Institute (later acquired by Wyeth), one of the earliest biotechnology companies. Subsequently he was a leading scientist at Genentech for 20 years where he contributed in various disciplines including vaccinology, immunology, stem cell biology, cellular signaling mechanisms and monoclonal antibody therapy of tumors. He was appointed a Genentech fellow, the company’s highest scientific position.
Prior to joining The Column Group, Larry was with US Venture Partners and was the founding investor of Cleave Biosciences and led the firm’s participation in Intellikine (acquired by Takeda/MLNM) and Calithera Biosciences. As a general partner and co-founder of Latterell Venture Partners from 2002 to 2007, Larry was the founding investor of Proteolix (acquired by Onyx Pharmaceuticals) and OncoMed Pharmaceuticals and was instrumental in the founding of Cellective Therapeutics (acquired by Medimmune), Tetralogic and BioVerdant.  
Larry has been a lecturer at the University of California, Berkeley’s Haas School of Business and currently sits on the board of directors of Carmot Therapeutics, eFFECTOR Pharmaceuticals, Ribon Therapeutics, ORIC Pharmaceuticals, Peloton Therapeutics and OncoMed Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ:OMED). He is also on the board of trustees of SFJAZZ.
An avid jazz and classical musician, Larry earned a B.A. in music and Ph.D. in molecular biology from the University of California, Los Angeles and completed his post-doctoral studies at the California Institute of Technology. 






            Mark A. Goldsmith, M.D., Ph.D.            

            Founding President, Chief Executive Officer and Board Director            



Mark grew up around academic medical centers and knew early on that he would devote his professional life to medical science on behalf of patients. After studying biology and science in human affairs at Princeton University, he pursued a dual career in clinical medicine and scientific research through the Medical Scientist Training Program at the University of California San Francisco (UCSF). After postgraduate training at the Brigham and Women’s Hospital/Harvard Medical School and UCSF, Mark joined the faculty of the UCSF School of Medicine, led a dynamic research laboratory within the Gladstone Institute of Virology and Immunology focused on the pathogenesis of and discovery of new treatments for life-threatening viral diseases, and taught and practiced medicine at the San Francisco General Hospital/UCSF. He co-authored 85 scientific publications and is co-inventor on multiple issued patents and applications. He also served as assistant director of the Gladstone Institute of Virology and Immunology and was consultant and collaborator to a variety of small and large biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies.
Mark has also been active in business since childhood, negotiating his first significant technology deal while a graduate student. After a productive career in academia, he was recruited to the private sector, where he served in senior management roles in private and public biotechnology companies, including Genencor International and Constellation Pharmaceuticals, where he drove the development of an industry-leading strategic alliance with Genentech, a member of the Roche Group. Prior to REVOLUTION Medicines, he served as chief executive officer of four companies spanning early discovery through full development. He also served as senior executive-in-residence at Prospect Venture Partners. Since 2012 Mark has been a partner in Third Rock Ventures and leader of its West Coast operations. He led the collaboration with David Pompliano, Marty Burke and others that gave rise to REVOLUTION Medicines.
Mark holds an A.B. from Princeton University and an M.D. and Ph.D. in microbiology and immunology from UCSF. In addition to his role at REVOLUTION Medicines, he serves as chairman of the board for Constellation Pharmaceuticals and a board director for Igenica Biotherapeutics. 






            Michael Bonney             

            Former Chief Executive Officer, Cubist Pharmeceuticals            



Mike, former Partner at Third Rock Ventures, was the chief executive officer and director of Cubist Pharmaceuticals from 2003 until his retirement at the year-end of 2014. Under Mike's leadership Cubist grew from a struggling micro-cap to the world's leading antibiotic company. Cubist was acquired by Merck early in 2015. He joined Cubist as president and chief operating officer in 2002. He was was vice president of sales and marketing at Biogen from 1995-2001 where he built Biogen's commercial infrastructure for the launch of the company's first product. Prior to Biogen he spent 11+ years at Zeneca Pharmaceuticals (and predecessor companies) in a range of commercial, operating and strategic roles, ending his career there as national business director. 
Mike currently chairs the boards of Alnylam Pharmaceuticals and Bates College. He is also a member of the boards of CELGENE Corporation, Global Blood Therapeutics, Tekla Capital Management (closed end mutual fund complex), Gulf of Maine Research Institute, and the Whitehead Institute of Biomedical Research. 
He is an advisor to the prime minister of Cameron Commission on antimicrobial resistance (AMR) and was involved in the creation of the GAIN act (enacted in the US in 2012 to encourage investment in antimicrobials with activity against resistant bacteria). 
Mike was a regional winner and national finalist (2013) in the life science segment of Ernst & Young's Entrepreneur of the Year; was a finalist (2011) in DJ/Morningside CEO of the Year and was recognized as the Top CEO in Massachusetts by the Boston Globe (2008). 






            Liz McKee Anderson            

            Former Worldwide Vice President, Infectious Diseases and Vaccines at Janssen Pharmaceuticals, Inc            



With degrees in engineering and finance and an early career in the chemicals industry, Liz soon discovered her passion for bringing innovative medicines to market to prevent or treat life-threatening disease. Applying a strong analytic framework, strategic discipline and commercial experience in leading high growth businesses, she brings a deep commitment to partnerships with R&D and operating colleagues to benefit patients.
Liz previously served as the worldwide vice president and commercial leader in the infectious diseases and vaccines global commercial strategy organization at Janssen Pharmaceuticals, a Johnson & Johnson company. In this role, she led strategy, global commercialization and market access for the respiratory infections, HIV, sexually transmitted infections and bacterial pathogens portfolios. Ms. Anderson also helped develop and execute Janssen’s first global vaccines strategy and played a key role in the acquisition of vaccines company Crucell N.V. She held several leadership positions within Johnson & Johnson, including worldwide vice president, immunology & respiratory, global strategic marketing, and worldwide vice president, global strategic marketing for the biotechnology, immunology and oncology business unit. Liz played key roles in the launch or life cycle management of important Janssen brands, including STELARA, SIMPONI, VELCADE and REMICADE, in the development of numerous early and medium-stage compounds and in the advancement of therapeutic area and company strategies. During her tenure, she served on the Centocor, Inc. and Crucell management boards, the Centyrex and Betalogics internal venture boards, the BIO R&D management board and the Pharmaceuticals Group development committee.
Prior to joining Johnson & Johnson, Liz was the vice president and general manager of Wyeth Vaccines from 1997 to 2002, where she played a key role in the launch of PREVNAR, a first-in-class vaccine that achieved $1 billion in sales within 18 months of introduction, the most successful launch in the 75-year history of Wyeth and for which she received the President’s Award. Earlier in her career, Liz served as the vice president and general manager for the U.S. biopharmaceuticals business of Rhone Poulenc Rorer and as the vice president of plasma operations for the American National Red Cross.
Liz holds a B.S. in engineering from Rutgers College of Engineering and an M.B.A. in finance from the Sellinger School of Business and Management at Loyola University in Maryland. She serves on the board of directors of Bavarian Nordic A/S, the board of trustees of The Haverford School, the Bryn Mawr Hospital Foundation and The Wistar Institute, a leading biomedical research organization, and serves as a consultant and advisor and as a guest lecturer at Wharton. 








ABOUT US
OUR VALUES
OUR TEAM













